Vermont statutes. Title 14A Trusts
Chapter 4. Creation, Validity, Modification, and Termination of Trust
§ 417.
Combination and division of trusts.

After notice to the qualified beneficiaries, a trustee may combine two or more trusts into a single trust or divide a trust into two or more separate trusts if the result does not impair rights of any beneficiary or adversely affect achievement of the purposes of the trust.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section, which authorizes the combination or division of trusts, is subject to contrary provision in the terms of the trust.
See
Section 105 and Article 4 General Comment. Many trust instruments and standardized estate planning forms include comprehensive provisions governing combination and division of trusts. Except for the requirement that the qualified beneficiaries receive advance notice of a proposed combination or division, this section is similar to Restatement (Third) of Trusts § 68 (Tentative Draft No. 3, approved 2001).

This section allows a trustee to combine two or more trusts even though their terms are not identical. Typically the trusts to be combined will have been created by different members of the same family and will vary on only insignificant details, such as the presence of different perpetuities savings periods. The more the dispositive provisions of the trusts to be combined differ from each other the more likely it is that a combination would impair some beneficiary’s interest, hence the less likely that the combination can be approved. Combining trusts may prompt more efficient trust administration and is sometimes an alternative to terminating an uneconomic trust as authorized by Section 414. Administrative economies promoted by combining trusts include a potential reduction in trustees’ fees, particularly if the trustee charges a minimum fee per trust, the ability to file one trust income tax return instead of multiple returns, and the ability to invest a larger pool of capital more effectively. Particularly if the terms of the trust are identical, available administrative economies may suggest that the trustee has a responsibility to pursue a combination.
See
Section 805 (duty to incur only reasonable costs).

Division of trusts is often beneficial and, in certain circumstances, almost routine. Division of trusts is frequently undertaken due to a desire to obtain maximum advantage of exemptions available under the federal generation-skipping tax. While the terms of the trusts which result from such a division are identical, the division will permit differing investment objectives to be pursued and allow for discretionary distributions to be made from one trust and not the other. Given the substantial tax benefits often involved, a failure by the trustee to pursue a division might in certain cases be a breach of fiduciary duty. The opposite could also be true if the division is undertaken to increase fees or to fit within the small trust termination provision.
See
Section 414.

This section authorizes a trustee to divide a trust even if the trusts that result are dissimilar. Conflicts among beneficiaries, including differing investment objectives, often invite such a division, although as in the case with a proposed combination of trusts, the more the terms of the divided trusts diverge from the original plan, the less likely it is that the settlor’s purposes would be achieved and that the division could be approved.

This section does not require that a combination or division be approved either by the court or by the beneficiaries. Prudence may dictate, however, that court approval under Section 410 be sought and beneficiary consent obtained whenever the terms of the trusts to be combined or the trusts that will result from a division differ substantially one from the other. For the provisions relating to beneficiary consent or ratification of a transaction, or release of trustee from liability, see Section 1009.

While the consent of the beneficiaries is not necessary before a trustee may combine or divide trusts under this section, advance notice to the qualified beneficiaries of the proposed combination or division is required. This is consistent with Section 813, which requires that the trustee keep the beneficiaries reasonably informed of trust administration, including the giving of advance notice to the qualified beneficiaries of several specified actions that may have a major impact on their interests.

Numerous States have enacted statutes authorizing division of trusts, either by trustee action or upon court order. For a list of these statutes, see Restatement (Third) Property: Donative Transfers § 12.2 Statutory Note (Tentative Draft No. 1, approved 1995). Combination or division has also been authorized by the courts in the absence of authorizing statute.
See, e.g., In re Will of Marcus
, 552 N.Y.S. 2d 546 (Surr. Ct.1990) (combination);

In re Heller Inter Vivos Trust

, 613 N.Y.S. 2d 809 (Surr. Ct. 1994) (division); and

BankBoston v. Marlow

, 701 N.E. 2d 304 (Mass. 1998) (division).

For a provision authorizing a trustee, in distributing the assets of the divided trust, to make non-pro-rata distributions, see Section 816(22).

§ 418.
Intentional and unlawful killing; termination of interest in trust.

A person who commits an intentional and unlawful killing shall forfeit an interest in a trust:

to the extent the trust was funded by the victim of the intentional and unlawful killing or would be funded by the victim’s estate;

to the extent the person’s interest in the trust is augmented or advanced by the termination of the victim’s interest in the trust as the result of the person’s intentional and unlawful killing of the victim, and the interest is attributable to funding by someone other than the person or the victim of the intentional and unlawful killing;

if the interest was created as the result of an exercise of a power of appointment held by the victim.

An interest in a trust that is forfeited under subsection (a) of this section shall be administered and distributed in accordance with the terms of the trust as if the person whose interest is forfeited died on the date of the intentional and unlawful killing.

A person who commits an intentional and unlawful killing shall be removed as trustee of a trust:

that was funded by the victim of the intentional and unlawful killing or would be funded by the victim’s estate;

in which the person’s interest in the trust is augmented or advanced by the termination of the victim’s interest in the trust as the result of the person’s intentional and unlawful killing of the victim, and the interest is attributable to funding by someone other than the person or the victim of the intentional and unlawful killing.

For purposes of this section, the record of a conviction of a person for an intentional and unlawful killing of another shall be conclusive evidence that the person committed an intentional and unlawful killing of the other person.

In the absence of a final judgment of conviction, a beneficiary or trustee of a trust may petition the Probate Division of the Superior Court for a determination, or the court may on its own initiative determine, that the interest of a person who commits an intentional and unlawful killing has been forfeited under subsection (a) of this section, or that a person should be removed as trustee under subsection (c) of this section.

This section shall apply to any interest in a trust that is or will be distributed on or after January 1, 2009.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 55

, § 9; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 236, eff. February 1, 2011.